Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 12 Water Pollution
46-12-24.
State grants and loans for pollution prevention facilities to governmental entities.

The director is authorized, within any limits of funds made available therefor, to make grants and loans to any municipality, inter-municipal agency, municipal sewer district, or state district or agency for the construction of necessary facilities to prevent the discharge of untreated or inadequately treated pollutants into the waters of the state, and for the preparation of reports, plans, and specifications required in connection therewith under the following terms:

The grant or loan shall be made only in connection with a project which has or would be eligible for a grant or loan under the Clean Water Act, 33 U.S.C. § 1251 et seq., as amended from time to time.

The amount of the grant or loan shall be in an amount necessary to assure the recipient of the maximum federal aid that it can anticipate qualifying for under the Clean Water Act, 33 U.S.C. § 1251 et seq., or to supplement federal aid when the maximum federal aid, for which the project is eligible, is not currently available, or to provide state assistance for projects which are eligible under the Clean Water Act but which may not receive such federal assistance.

The plans and specifications for the project must be approved by the director in accordance with this chapter.

The grant or loan shall be made available to the applicant in partial payments on a time schedule similar to that followed by the United States Environmental Protection Agency, the payments to be proportioned in a similar manner except that the director may reimburse applicants for eligible projects that have already been initiated, but not yet completed, and for which only partial federal and/or state aid was provided.

No grant or loan shall be made for any project until the applicant has made provision satisfactory to the director for assuring its proper and efficient operation and maintenance.

An applicant for a grant or loan must file such executed forms and provide such information as may be required by the director.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 198, § 14; G.L. 1956, § 46-12-33; P.L. 1983, ch. 149, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 289, art. 1, § 1.

46-12-24.1.
State grants and loans for pollution prevention facilities to nongovernmental entities.

The director is authorized within any limits of funds made available therefor, to make grants and loans to any nongovernmental entities in Rhode Island for the construction of necessary facilities to prevent the discharge of untreated or inadequately treated pollutants into the waters of the state, and for the preparation of reports, plans, and specifications required in connection therewith under the following terms:

The plans and specifications for the project must be approved by the director in accordance with this chapter.

No grant or loan shall be made for any project until the applicant has made provision satisfactory to the director for assuring its proper and efficient operation and maintenance.

An applicant for a grant or loan must file such executed forms and provide such information as may be required by the director.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 289, art. 1, § 2.

46-12-24.2.
Rhode Island Clean Water Act environmental trust fund.

Findings.

Protecting the ground and surface water of the state from pollution is vital to the health and general welfare of the citizens of the state;

Construction, rehabilitation, and maintenance of modern and efficient waste water treatment systems and facilities is essential to protecting and improving the state’s water quality and to the state’s development;

Significant nonpoint sources of pollution and combinations of sewerage and storm water runoff collection systems exist in the state and contribute to pollution;

Certain areas of the state continue to be served by septic systems even though those areas should be served by interceptors to carry pollutants to waste water treatment facilities;

Federal funds available to the state in the form of grants pursuant to the federal Clean Water Act, 33 U.S.C. § 1251 et seq., are currently inadequate to permit Rhode Island governmental entities to achieve secondary treatment within a five (5) year period, and the anticipated reduction in federal funds available to the state and its governmental units may make it difficult to achieve the goal of improvement to the state’s water quality;

A fund should be established to provide sufficient continuing financial resources so that the state may achieve its water quality goals by providing for loans and grants to governmental entities and others.

Creation of fund. There is hereby created the Rhode Island Clean Water Act environmental trust fund (hereinafter referred to as “the fund” or “the Trust Fund”) into which shall be deposited with the general treasurer of the state of Rhode Island:

Proceeds from the sale of bonds and notes, including any premiums and accrued interest, issued under or advances pursuant to, article III of the Public Laws 1987, chapter 289;

State appropriations;

Repayment of loans from entities which have been qualified to receive loans by the director;

Federal grants and loans; and

Unless otherwise specified by the director, all other money, including gifts, bequests, administrative, and civil and criminal penalties received in connection with the enforcement of this chapter, or other funds from any public or private sources which money are intended to improve water quality.

Use of fund; purposes. All money in the fund shall be expended in accordance with the general laws of the state of Rhode Island, and are hereby specifically restricted to providing grants and loans, and required state share or related expenses for the Narragansett Bay study, consistent with the provisions of this chapter and with the provisions of the Clean Water Act, 33 U.S.C. § 1251 et seq., as it may be amended from time to time. Proceeds from the sale of bonds and notes deposited into the fund shall be expended in accordance with the proposition approved by the people. Any proceeds from the sale of bonds or notes approved by the people after 1988, may also be expended for the Narragansett Bay study to develop and implement a conservation and management plan, and by the department of environmental management to implement a management program for the control of water pollution from nonpoint sources, including all necessary administrative costs. With respect to the fund, the state controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment out of the fund of such sum or sums as may be required from time to time upon receipt by him or her of properly authenticated vouchers approved by the director (as hereinafter defined) or his or her delegate. Expenses of issue of the bonds and notes issued under article III of Public Laws 1987, chapter 289, may be paid from the fund.

Administration of fund. All money in the fund shall be expended under the direction and supervision of the director and the director or the director’s delegate, as the case may be, shall be vested with all power and authority necessary and incidental to the purposes of this chapter, and these powers and authorities granted to the director or the director’s delegate, as the case may be, shall be in addition to and not in substitution for all other power provided by law.

Investment of money in fund. All money in the fund not immediately required for payment pursuant to the provisions of this section may be invested by the state investment commission as established by chapter 10 of title 35; provided, however, that the securities in which the fund is invested shall remain part of the fund until exchanged for other securities, and provided, further, that the income from any investments shall remain as part of the fund, unless prohibited by applicable federal law.

Advances from general fund. The general treasurer is authorized from time to time with the approval of the governor and the director of the department of administration in anticipation of the receipts of funds enumerated in subsection (b) to advance sums to the fund for the purposes specified in subsection (c), any funds of the state not specifically held for any particular purposes; provided, however, that any advances made to the fund shall be returned to the general fund forthwith upon receipt by the fund of monies to the extent of the advances.

Termination of fund. Upon a finding by the director that the fund is no longer needed for its purposes, the fund shall be terminated and shall be audited. Ninety (90) days following the final audit of the fund by the state auditor general, the fund shall cease to exist and any unobligated money in the fund shall be transferred to the state’s general fund and shall be applied to the payment of debt service charges of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 289, art. 11, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 114; P.L. 1988, ch. 238, art. 1, § 1.

46-12-24.3.
Repealed.

46-12-25.
Report required by owners or lessees of solid waste disposal areas.

If any person, firm, or corporation continuously uses any area for the disposal of solid waste which is located within two hundred feet (200´) of any water course, then the owner of the land or lessee, if leased land, where the area is located must submit to the director a written report every sixty (60) days or more frequently if required by the director. The report shall contain among other things the content of dissolved oxygen, the biological oxygen demand, chlorides, iron, and a coliform bacteria count, from sites tested immediately upstream and downstream of the landfill area at locations prescribed by the director.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 207, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 149, § 1.

46-12-25.1.
Repealed.

46-12-26.
Penalty for failure to report.

Any person, firm, or corporation who shall fail to submit reports as required by §

46-12-25

, shall be punished by a fine of four hundred dollars ($400) per day for each day that a report is not filed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 207, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 46-12-35; P.L. 1983, ch. 149, § 1.

46-12-27.
Penalty for falsification of report.

Any person, firm, or corporation who shall falsify any report required by §

46-12-25

, shall be punished by a fine not exceeding four hundred dollars ($400), or by imprisonment of not more than one year, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 207, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 46-12-36; P.L. 1983, ch. 149, § 1.

46-12-28.
Protection of groundwaters.

Groundwaters shall be and shall be deemed to be waters of the state and shall be protected pursuant to the provisions of this chapter with respect to the following activities, which shall be regulated by the director in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and chapter 13.1 of this title:

Discharge of pollutants onto or beneath the land surface; in a location where it is likely for the pollutants to enter the groundwaters of the state;

Subsurface containment systems used to store wastewaters, petroleum products, hazardous materials or other pollutants;

Facilities which treat or provide for disposal of petroleum products, hazardous materials, hazardous waste, solid waste or dredged material;

Facilities with store bulk quantities of petroleum products, hazardous materials or hazardous waste;

Facilities and activities which have caused or have the potential to cause a release of pollutants to groundwater;

Activities undertaken to remediate groundwater quality.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 149, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 149, § 1.

46-12-29.
Effective date of chapter.

This chapter shall take effect on September 15, 1983, except that prior to that date the director of the department of environmental management may conduct any hearings necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter, and file with the secretary of state any rules and regulations authorized by this chapter to take effect on or after that date.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 253, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

46-12-37

; P.L. 1983, ch. 149, § 1.

46-12-30.
Repealed.

46-12-30.1.
Repealed.

46-12-30.2.
Definitions and guidelines for replacement and periodic inspection of tanks.

All definitions and guidelines for replacement and periodic inspection of tanks shall be developed by the director of the department of environmental management in conjunction with the director’s efforts to promulgate regulations for underground storage facilities used for petroleum products and hazardous materials, to be promulgated under the authority of this chapter and chapters 17.1 and 35 of title 42.

The regulations shall require that all federally regulated underground storage tanks used for petroleum products and subject to registration in this state shall be inspected at least once in each thirty-six (36) month period.

Any funds remaining in the underground storage tank replacement revolving loan program account after repeal of §

46-12-30.3

shall be used in accordance with the provisions of subsections (a) and (b) of this section and any rules and regulations promulgated therein.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 486, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 62; P.L. 2002, ch. 239, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 103, art. 4, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 100, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 114, § 1.

46-12-30.3.
Repealed.

46-12-30.4.
Repealed.

46-12-30.5.
Bonds authorized.

The general treasurer is hereby authorized and empowered, with the approval of the governor and in accordance with the requirements of law, to issue from time to time bonds in the name and on behalf of the state and in such amounts as may be specified in an amount not to exceed one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000).

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 486, § 1.

46-12-31 — 46-12-36.
[Transferred.]

46-12-37.
Waste from seagoing vessels.

The owners and/or agents of any seagoing vessel entering the waters or waterways of this state which intends to transfer or discharge any type of waste or bilge at a certified shore facility or terminal pursuant to the Resource and Conservation Recovery Act (RCRA), 42 U.S.C. § 6901 et seq., shall first file a performance bond or other evidence of financial responsibility with the director in the amount of at least fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) payable to the state of Rhode Island. In the event the vessel causes damage to the environment, the bond shall be forfeited to the extent of the costs incurred by the state to rectify and clean up the damage to the environment and natural resources of the state and to the extent of any fine levied for violations of water pollution abatement laws. Any seagoing vessel transferring any type of waste or bilge without coverage shall be fined not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000).

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 96, § 1.

46-12-38.
Licensing of underground storage tank tightness testing.

Definitions. As used in this section and in conjunction with this chapter these terms shall be construed to mean:

“Test” means a tank tightness test capable of detecting a five hundredths (.05) gallon per hour leak from any portion of an underground storage tank (including but not limited to piping) that routinely contains petroleum products or hazardous materials while accounting for effects such as thermal expansion or contraction of the petroleum product or hazardous materials, vapor pockets, tank deformation, evaporation or condensation, the location of the water table, or other conditions that could affect test results and which have been approved, in writing, by the director for use in the state of Rhode Island.

“Tester” means an individual who performs tightness tests on underground storage tanks.

“Testing business” means a person who employs or subcontracts with testers in the regular course of business.

Authority of the director. The director shall promulgate rules and regulations consistent with this chapter and with chapter 13.1 of title 46 entitled “Groundwater Protection” for the licensing of testers and testing businesses. Nothing in this section shall limit the director’s powers and duties as set forth in this chapter.

License requirement and fee.

No person shall test underground storage tanks or operate a testing business without a license issued by the director in accordance with this section.

The director shall charge an annual fee of one hundred dollars ($100) to each tester to whom he or she issues a license. No licensure shall be issued unless the tester and testing business have paid the license fee. The director shall deposit the fees collected into the water and air protection program account created pursuant to §

42-17.1-2(26)

.

The results of any test performed by or on behalf of an unlicensed tester or testing business shall be considered null and void. Where it is determined that test(s) have been performed by an unlicensed tester or testing business, the owner or operator of the underground storage tank(s) shall, within ten (10) days of discovery, either have the underground storage tank(s) retested by a duly licensed tester or testing business, or have the underground storage tank(s) emptied and removed from the ground as if they had failed the test(s). Any unlicensed tester or testing business that conducts business in the state of Rhode Island shall be strictly liable for the cost of any retesting performed in accordance with this section.

No license shall be issued unless the tester and/or testing business shall demonstrate that they, jointly or severally, possess liability insurance in an amount satisfactory to the director for any environmental harm, property damage and bodily injury resulting from tank tightness testing activities, including, but not limited to, performance of tests; the collection, calculation and analysis of test data; handling, calibration, operation and maintenance of testing equipment; and the preparation of test results. The amount of liability insurance shall be established by the director.

The rules and regulations promulgated by the director in accordance with this section may, without limitation, require that testers hold and maintain certain certifications, and/or pass written or practical examinations as a prerequisite to licensure. The director may assess a reasonable fee to cover the cost of any examination administered by or on behalf of the department of environmental management.

Revocation of license. The director shall revoke the license of any tester or testing business who fails to comply with this section or with the rules and regulations promulgated hereunder after the director has provided the party with notice and the opportunity to be heard in accordance with chapter 35 of title 42.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 320, § 3; P.L. 1998, ch. 52, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 304, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 475, § 28.

46-12-39.
Discharge of sewage from boats.

It shall be unlawful to discharge any sewage from a boat into the waters of the state unless discharged via a marine toilet which is either a marine sanitation device-type I, or a marine sanitation device-type II, in proper working condition.

It shall be unlawful to discharge any sewage from a boat into the waters of the state in an area which has been declared to be a no discharge zone.

It shall be unlawful to operate or moor in the waters of the state, a boat which is equipped with a marine toilet which is not a type approved pursuant to the Clean Water Act, 33 U.S.C. § 1251 et seq., and that is in proper working condition.

It shall be unlawful to operate or moor in the waters of the state in an area declared to be a no discharge zone, a boat which is equipped with a marine toilet which is not properly sealed to prevent discharge of sewage into the water.

No discharge zones shall be identified by the department of environmental management. The department of environmental management shall utilize criteria established under the Federal Water Pollution Control Act of 1972 (Water Quality Act), 33 U.S.C. § 1251 et seq., and 40 CFR 140.4 in identifying such areas, and shall be the sole agency of the state in seeking federal designation of such areas; it shall seek the advice and comment of the Coastal Resources Management Council (CRMC). Municipalities of the state may nominate areas for designation as no discharge zones only as an element of a Harbor Management Plan (HMP) approved by the CRMC in accordance with established regulation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 332, § 2.

46-12-39.1.
No discharge certificate decal — Required.

Definitions. As used in this section and in conjunction with this chapter, the following terms shall be construed as follows:

“Certification agent” means a marina or boatyard which is capable of installing sewage disposal holding tanks and related equipment; a certified marine sewage pump-out facility, including a mobile facility; other established marine businesses, included, but not limited to, marine surveyors and mobile marine repair facilities, that are experienced in the evaluation, repair and/or installation of boat sewage systems; and local harbor masters and assistant harbor masters.

No person shall operate or moor for more than thirty (30) days, a boat in the waters of the state, that has a permanently installed marine toilet unless such boat displays in a prominent position an approved “no discharge certificate decal.”

Subsection 45-12-39.1(b) shall not apply to any vessel carrying a valid certificate of inspection issued by the U.S. Coast Guard pursuant to title 46 of the U.S. Code.

Two (2) no discharge certificate decals, differing in color, shall be made available by the department of environmental management for issuance to boats subject to the requirements of this section.

Decals of one color shall signify that the recipient boat has a marine toilet, in proper working order, which is either a marine sanitation device-type I, a marine sanitation device-type II, or a marine sanitation device-type III with a holding tank and through-hull fitting that would allow sewage to be discharged overboard, but the boat owner or operator had taken the steps necessary to prevent the discharge of sewage into the waters of the state.

Decals of the other color shall signify that the recipient boat either has a marine sanitation device-type III with a holding tank and no through-hull fitting that would allow sewage to be discharged overboard, or no marine toilet at all.

Certification shall remain in effect for forty-eight (48) months after each certification, and no additional certification shall be required during that period.

The department of environmental management shall collect and deposit into a separate general revenue account a fee of ten dollars ($10.00) for each certificate to defray the cost of implementation of this section.

Certificate decals may be obtained from any certification agent.

Before a certificate decal may be issued, a certification agent must visually inspect each permanently installed marine toilet on a boat, as well as any associated plumbing or holding tank fixtures, to ascertain whether the boat is in compliance with §

46-12-39

. If necessary, the certification agent shall perform a color-dye flush test of each toilet to verify compliance.

For inspections conducted pursuant to this section, certification agents may collect and retain a fee, not to exceed twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for each permanently installed marine toilet aboard each boat. This fee shall be in addition to the minimum ten dollar ($10.00) fee for each decal issued, which certification agents shall collect and forward to the department of environmental management pursuant to subsection (f) above.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 338, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 399, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 243, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 45, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 181, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 201, § 1.

46-12-40.
Penalty for violations.

Every person in violation of §

46-12-39

or owning, operating or causing to be operated, upon the waters of the state, a boat in violation of the provisions of §

46-12-39

or aiding in so doing, shall for the first offense be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or be imprisoned for not more than one year in the adult correctional institutions, or both such fine and imprisonment, and for a second and each subsequent offense shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or be imprisoned for not more than one year in the adult correctional institutions, or both such fine and imprisonment, in the discretion of the court. If a municipality assists in the prosecution of a violation of § 46-12-39 any fine imposed for that violation shall be paid one-half (1/2) thereof to the general treasurer of the state and one-half (1/2) thereof to the treasurer of the town or city where the offense occurred.

Every person in violation of §

46-12-39.1

, or owning, operating or causing to be operated, upon the waters of the state, a boat in violation of the provisions of §

46-12-39.1

, shall be guilty of a civil violation and subject to a fine of up to one hundred dollars ($100). If a municipality assists in the prosecution of a violation of § 46-12-39.1, any fine imposed for that violation shall be paid one-half (1/2) thereof to the general treasurer of the state and one-half (1/2) thereof to the treasurer of the town or city where the offense occurred.

Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the municipal court shall have concurrent jurisdiction with the district court to hear and adjudicate violations under this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 332, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 338, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 399, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 45, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 181, § 3.

46-12-41.
Enforcement.

The department of environmental management, harbormasters, assistant harbormasters, police officers authorized to make arrests, and employees of the department of environmental management authorized to enforce the provisions of chapter 22 of this title shall have the authority to enforce the provisions of §

46-12-39

and §

46-12-39

.1. In the exercise of enforcing the provisions of § 46-12-39 they shall have the authority to stop and board any vessel subject to this chapter.

Harbormasters and assistant harbormasters are authorized to make periodic color dye flush tests of boats subject to §

46-12-39.1

, and may check such boats moored in their jurisdictions for no discharge certificate decals, as required pursuant to §

46-12-39.1

.

Municipalities of the state may deny a mooring permit to any boat not in compliance with §

46-12-39.1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 332, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 338, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 399, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 45, § 4; P.L. 2006, ch. 181, § 4.